Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 12 Georgia Coordinating Committee for Rural and Human Services Transportation

Cross references.

Transit Governance Study Commission; creation; members; report; funds, §

50-32-5

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 1/HB 277, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transportation Investment Act of 2010.’ ”

32-12-1 through 32-12-6.
[Repealed]

History.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 4/HB 277; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-19/HB 214; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 950, § 1/HB 386, effective July 1, 2015.